Wyoming, session 2025, HB0248.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-2-1005(c) by creating a new
paragraph (iii) is amended to read:

9-2-1005. Payment of warrants; budget powers of
governor; agency budgets; federal funds; new employees.

(c) The governor shall not:

HB0248

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0118
(iii) Authorize an increase in the amount
appropriated by any legislative appropriation act from the
public school foundation program account except to ensure
sufficient funds are available to fund the foundation
program as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(v) for each school
district.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0248